North Carolina statutes. Chapter 147. State Officers.
Article 6D. Sudan (Darfur) Divestment Act.

§§ 147-86.41 through 147-86.49.
[Repealed]

History.

G.S. 147-86.41

; 2007-486, s. 1; repealed by 2021-58, s. 1(c), effective June 28, 2021. G.S. 147-86.42; 2007-486, s. 2; 2015-241, s. 21.2(a); 2015-268, s. 7.5; 2017-193, s. 2.1; 2018-84, s. 4(b); repealed by 2021-58, s. 1(c), effective June 28, 2021. G.S. 147-86.43; 2007-486, s. 3; 2017-193, s. 2.2; repealed by 2021-58, s. 1(c), effective June 28, 2021. G.S. 147-86.44; 2007-486, s. 4; 2015-241, s. 21.2(b); 2015-268, s. 7.5; 2017-193, s. 2.3; repealed by 2021-58, s. 1(c), effective June 28, 2021. G.S. 147-86.45; 2007-486, s. 5; 2017-193, s. 2.4; repealed by 2021-58, s. 1(c), effective June 28, 2021. G.S. 147-86.46; 2007-486, s. 6; repealed by 2021-58, s. 1(c), effective June 28, 2021. G.S. 147-86.47; 2007-486, s. 7; repealed by 2017-193, s. 2.5, effective October 1, 2017. G.S. 147-86.48; 2007-486, s. 8; repealed by 2017-193, s. 2.5, effective October 1, 2017. G.S. 147-86.49; 2007-486, s. 9; repealed by 2021-58, s. 1(c), effective June 28, 2021; repealed by 2021-180, s. 37.12(d), effective November 18, 2021.

§§ 147-86.50 through 147-86.54.

Reserved for future codification purposes.